Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5629.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-30 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-30. Health insurance contracts — Infertility.
(a) Any health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or
renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other
governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages
of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years and for standard fertility-preservation services when a
medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility to a
covered person. To the extent that a health insurance contract provides reimbursement for a test or
procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than infertility, the tests and
procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided attendant to the diagnosis
and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42)
years; provided, that a subscriber co-payment not to exceed twenty percent (20%) may be required
for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise
presumably healthy individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of
one year.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 27-18-19 or any other provision to the contrary,

this section shall apply to blanket or group policies of insurance.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Infertility” means:
(i) The presence of a condition recognized by a healthcare provider as a cause of loss or
impairment of fertility, based on an individual’s medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age,
physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination of those factors;
(ii) An individual’s inability to establish a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth
after twelve (12) months of unprotected sexual intercourse when the individual and the individual’s
partner have the necessary gametes to establish a pregnancy;
(iii) An individual's inability to establish a pregnancy after six (6) months of unprotected
sexual intercourse due to an individual's age when the individual and the individual’s partner have
the necessary gametes to establish pregnancy;
(iv) An individual’s inability to achieve pregnancy as an individual or with a partner
because the individual or the individual and the individual’s partner do not have the necessary
gametes to achieve a pregnancy;
(v) An individual’s increased risk, independently or with the individual’s partner, of
transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or chromosomal abnormality to a child; or
(vi) As defined by the American Society of Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or comparable organization.
(vii) Pregnancy resulting in a loss does not cause the time period of trying to establish a
pregnancy to be restarted.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” (2) "Standard
fertility-preservation services" means procedures consistent with established medical practices and
professional guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the
American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional medical organizations, its
successor organization, or a comparable organization, for an individual who has a medical or
genetic condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that has a possible side effect of or may
directly or indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility, and includes, but is not limited to, the
procurement, cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, and reproductive material.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
LC000882 - Page 2 of 13

the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 27-18-19 or any other provision to the contrary,
this section shall apply to blanket or group policies of insurance.
(g) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(d) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section shall be provided without
discrimination on the basis of age, ancestry, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender
expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex,
or sexual orientation.
(e) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section shall include:
(1) At least four (4) complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers from those
oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval;
(2) The medical costs related to an embryo transfer to be made from or on behalf of an
insured to a third party; and
(3) Coverage regardless of whether donor gametes or embryos are used or if an embryo
will be transferred to a surrogate.
(f) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall not impose any of the
following:
(1) Deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, benefit maximums, waiting periods, or any
other limitations on coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility, including the
prescription of fertility medications, different from those imposed on benefits for services not
related to infertility;
(2) Pre-existing condition exclusions or pre-existing condition waiting periods on coverage
for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility nor use any prior diagnosis of or prior treatment of
infertility as a basis for excluding, limiting, or otherwise restricting the availability of coverage for
required benefits;
(3) Limitations on coverage based solely on arbitrary factors, including number of
attempts, dollar amounts, or age, or provide different benefits to, or impose different requirements
on, a class protected under § 23-17-19.1, than that provided to other insureds;
(4) Impose any limitations on coverage required under this section based on an individual's
use of donor gametes, donor embryos or surrogacy;
(5) Exclusions, limitations, or other restrictions on coverage of fertility medications that
are different from those imposed on any other prescription medications; or
(6) Limitations under the policy based on anything other than the medical assessment of
LC000882 - Page 3 of 13

an individual’s licensed healthcare provider.
(g) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section of this section shall provide
coverage under this section regardless of whether the insured foregoes a particular fertility
treatment or procedure, if the insured’s healthcare provider determines that the treatment or
procedures is likely to be unsuccessful or the insured seeks to use previously retrieved oocytes or
embryos.
(h) This section does not interfere with the clinical judgment of a healthcare provider. Any
clinical guidelines used for a policy subject to the requirements of this section shall be based on
current guidelines developed by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or a comparable organization such as the American Society of Clinical Oncology or
the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-23 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-23. Coverage for infertility.
(a) Any nonprofit hospital service contract, plan, or insurance policies delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare
or other governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage
for medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the
ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years and for standard fertility-preservation services
when a medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility
to a covered person. To the extent that a nonprofit hospital service corporation provides
reimbursement for a test or procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than
infertility, those tests and procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided
attendant to the diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and forty-two (42) years; provided, that a subscriber copayment, not to exceed twenty percent
(20%), may be required for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the
treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise
presumably healthy individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of
one year.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 27-18-19 or any other provision to the contrary,
this section shall apply to blanket or group policies of insurance.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Infertility” means:
LC000882 - Page 4 of 13

(i) The presence of a condition recognized by a healthcare provider as a cause of loss or
impairment of fertility, based on an individual’s medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age,
physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination of those factors;
(ii) An individual’s inability to establish a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth
after twelve (12) months of unprotected sexual intercourse when the individual and the individual’s
partner have the necessary gametes to establish a pregnancy;
(iii) An individual's inability to establish a pregnancy after six (6) months of unprotected
sexual intercourse due to an individual's age when the individual and the individual’s partner have
the necessary gametes to establish pregnancy;
(iv) An individual’s inability to achieve pregnancy as an individual or with a partner
because the individual or the individual and the individual’s partner do not have the necessary
gametes to achieve a pregnancy;
(v) An individual’s increased risk, independently or with the individual’s partner, of
transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or chromosomal abnormality to a child; or
(vi) As defined by the American Society of Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or comparable organization. Pregnancy resulting in a loss does not cause the time
period of trying to establish a pregnancy to be restarted.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” (2) "Standard
fertility-preservation services" means procedures consistent with established medical practices and
professional guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the
American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional medical organizations, its
successor organization, or a comparable organization, for an individual who has a medical or
genetic condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that has a possible side effect of or may
directly or indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility, and includes, but is not limited to, the
procurement, cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, and reproductive material.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(d) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section must be provided without
LC000882 - Page 5 of 13

discrimination on the basis of age, ancestry, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender
expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex,
or sexual orientation.
(e) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section must include:
(1) At least four complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers from those
oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval;
(2) The medical costs related to an embryo transfer to be made from or on behalf of an
insured to a third party; and
(3) Coverage regardless of whether donor gametes or embryos are used or if an embryo
will be transferred to a surrogate.
(f) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall not impose any of the
following:
(1) Deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, benefit maximums, waiting periods, or any
other limitations on coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility, including the
prescription of fertility medications, different from those imposed on benefits for services not
related to infertility;
(2) Pre-existing condition exclusions or pre-existing condition waiting periods on coverage
for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility nor use any prior diagnosis of or prior treatment of
infertility as a basis for excluding, limiting, or otherwise restricting the availability of coverage for
required benefits;
(3) Limitations on coverage based solely on arbitrary factors, including number of
attempts, dollar amounts, or age, or provide different benefits to, or impose different requirements
on, a class protected under § 23-17-19.1, than that provided to other insureds;
(4) Impose any limitations on coverage required under this section based on an individual's
use of donor gametes, donor embryos or surrogacy;
(5) Exclusions, limitations, or other restrictions on coverage of fertility medications that
are different from those impose on any other prescription medications; or
(6) Limitations under the policy based on anything other than the medical assessment of
an individual’s license healthcare provider.
(g) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall provide coverage under this
section regardless of whether the insured foregoes a particular fertility treatment or procedure if the
insured’s healthcare provider determines that the treatment or procedures is likely to be
unsuccessful or the insured seeks to use previously retrieved oocytes or embryos.
(h) This section does not interfere with the clinical judgment of a healthcare provider. Any
LC000882 - Page 6 of 13

clinical guidelines used for a policy subject to the requirements of this section must be based on
current guidelines developed by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or a comparable organization such as the American Society of Clinical Oncology or
the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-20. Coverage for infertility.
(a) Any nonprofit medical service contract, plan, or insurance policies delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare
or other governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage
for the medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between
the ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years and for standard fertility-preservation services
when a medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility
to a covered person. To the extent that a nonprofit medical service corporation provides
reimbursement for a test or procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than
infertility, those tests and procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided
attendant to the diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and forty-two (42) years; provided, that subscriber copayment, not to exceed twenty percent
(20%), may be required for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the
treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise
presumably healthy individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of
one year.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 27-18-19 or any other provision to the contrary,
this section shall apply to blanket or group policies of insurance.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Infertility” means:
(i) The presence of a condition recognized by a healthcare provider as a cause of loss or
impairment of fertility, based on an individual’s medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age,
physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination of those factors;
(ii) An individual’s inability to establish a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth
after twelve (12) months of unprotected sexual intercourse when the individual and the individual’s
partner have the necessary gametes to establish a pregnancy;
(iii) An individual's inability to establish a pregnancy after six (6) months of unprotected
LC000882 - Page 7 of 13

sexual intercourse due to an individual's age when the individual and the individual’s partner have
the necessary gametes to establish pregnancy;
(iv) An individual’s inability to achieve pregnancy as an individual or with a partner
because the individual or the individual and the individual’s partner do not have the necessary
gametes to achieve a pregnancy;
(v) An individual’s increased risk, independently or with the individual’s partner, of
transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or chromosomal abnormality to a child; or
(vi) As defined by the American Society of Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or comparable organization. Pregnancy resulting in a loss does not cause the time
period of trying to establish a pregnancy to be restarted.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” (2) "Standard
fertility-preservation services" means procedures consistent with established medical practices and
professional guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the
American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional medical organizations, its
successor organization, or a comparable organization, for an individual who has a medical or
genetic condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that has a possible side effect of or may
directly or indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility, and includes, but is not limited to, the
procurement, cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, and reproductive material.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(d) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section must be provided without
discrimination on the basis of age, ancestry, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender
expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex,
or sexual orientation.
(e) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section must include:
(1) At least four complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers from those
oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval;
(2) The medical costs related to an embryo transfer to be made from or on behalf of an
LC000882 - Page 8 of 13

insured to a third party; and
(3) Coverage regardless of whether donor gametes or embryos are used or if an embryo
will be transferred to a surrogate.
(f) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall not impose any of the
following:
(1) Deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, benefit maximums, waiting periods, or any
other limitations on coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility, including the
prescription of fertility medications, different from those imposed on benefits for services not
related to infertility;
(2) Pre-existing condition exclusions or pre-existing condition waiting periods on coverage
for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility nor use any prior diagnosis of or prior treatment of
infertility as a basis for excluding, limiting, or otherwise restricting the availability of coverage for
required benefits;
(3) Limitations on coverage based solely on arbitrary factors, including number of
attempts, dollar amounts, or age, or provide different benefits to, or impose different requirements
on, a class protected under § 23-17-19.1, than that provided to other insureds;
(4) Impose any limitations on coverage required under this section based on an individual's
use of donor gametes, donor embryos or surrogacy;
(5) Exclusions, limitations, or other restrictions on coverage of fertility medications that
are different from those impose on any other prescription medications; or
(6) Limitations under the policy based on anything other than the medical assessment of
an individual’s license healthcare provider.
(g) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall provide coverage under this
section regardless of whether the insured foregoes a particular fertility treatment or procedure if the
insured’s healthcare provider determines that the treatment or procedures is likely to be
unsuccessful or the insured seeks to use previously retrieved oocytes or embryos.
(h) This section does not interfere with the clinical judgment of a healthcare provider. Any
clinical guidelines used for a policy subject to the requirements of this section must be based on
current guidelines developed by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or a comparable organization such as the American Society of Clinical Oncology or
the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-33 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-33. Coverage for infertility.
LC000882 - Page 9 of 13

(a) Any health maintenance organization service contract plan or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state, except a contract providing supplemental coverage to
Medicare or other governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide
coverage for medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women
between the ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years and for standard fertility-preservation
services when a medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic
infertility to a covered person. To the extent that a health maintenance organization provides
reimbursement for a test or procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than
infertility, those tests and procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided
attendant to the diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and forty-two (42) years; provided, that subscriber copayment, not to exceed twenty percent
(20%), may be required for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the
treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise healthy
individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of one year.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 27-18-19 or any other provision to the contrary,
this section shall apply to blanket or group policies of insurance.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(i) (1) “Infertility” means:
(ii) The presence of a condition recognized by a healthcare provider as a cause of loss or
impairment of fertility, based on an individual’s medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age,
physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination of those factors;
(iii) An individual’s inability to establish a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth
after twelve (12) months of unprotected sexual intercourse when the individual and the individual’s
partner have the necessary gametes to establish a pregnancy;
(iv) An individual's inability to establish a pregnancy after six (6) months of unprotected
sexual intercourse due to an individual's age when the individual and the individual’s partner have
the necessary gametes to establish pregnancy;
(v) An individual’s inability to achieve pregnancy as an individual or with a partner
because the individual or the individual and the individual’s partner do not have the necessary
gametes to achieve a pregnancy;
(vi) An individual’s increased risk, independently or with the individual’s partner, of
transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or chromosomal abnormality to a child; or
(vi) As defined by the American Society of Reproductive Medicine, its successor
LC000882 - Page 10 of 13

organization, or comparable organization. Pregnancy resulting in a loss does not cause the time
period of trying to establish a pregnancy to be restarted.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” (2) "Standard
fertility-preservation services" means procedures consistent with established medical practices and
professional guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the
American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional medical organizations, its
successor organization, or a comparable organization, for an individual who has a medical or
genetic condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that has a possible side effect of or may
directly or indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility, and includes, but is not limited to, the
procurement, cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, and reproductive material.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(d) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section must be provided without
discrimination on the basis of age, ancestry, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender
expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex,
or sexual orientation.
(e) Coverage for the treatment of infertility under this section must include:
(1) At least four complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers from those
oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval;
(2) The medical costs related to an embryo transfer to be made from or on behalf of an
insured to a third party; and
(3) Coverage regardless of whether donor gametes or embryos are used or if an embryo
will be transferred to a surrogate.
(f) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall not impose any of the
following:
(1) Deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, benefit maximums, waiting periods, or any
other limitations on coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility, including the
prescription of fertility medications, different from those imposed on benefits for services not
LC000882 - Page 11 of 13

related to infertility;
(2) Pre-existing condition exclusions or pre-existing condition waiting periods on coverage
for the diagnosis and treatment of infertility nor use any prior diagnosis of or prior treatment of
infertility as a basis for excluding, limiting, or otherwise restricting the availability of coverage for
required benefits;
(3) Limitations on coverage based solely on arbitrary factors, including number of
attempts, dollar amounts, or age, or provide different benefits to, or impose different requirements
on, a class protected under § 23-17-19.1, than that provided to other insureds;
(4) Impose any limitations on coverage required under this section based on an individual's
use of donor gametes, donor embryos or surrogacy;
(5) Exclusions, limitations, or other restrictions on coverage of fertility medications that
are different from those impose on any other prescription medications; or
(6) Limitations under the policy based on anything other than the medical assessment of
an individual’s license healthcare provider.
(g) An insurer described in subsection (a) of this section shall provide coverage under this
section regardless of whether the insured foregoes a particular fertility treatment or procedure if the
insured’s healthcare provider determines that the treatment or procedures is likely to be
unsuccessful or the insured seeks to use previously retrieved oocytes or embryos.
(h) This section does not interfere with the clinical judgment of a healthcare provider. Any
clinical guidelines used for a policy subject to the requirements of this section must be based on
current guidelines developed by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or a comparable organization such as the American Society of Clinical Oncology or
the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000882
========
LC000882 - Page 12 of 13